Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1044.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1.1. Title 42, chapter 11, article 3, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 42-11134, to read: START_STATUTE42-11134. Exemption for virtual currency; definition A. Virtual currency is exempt from taxation. B. For the purposes of this section, "virtual currency" means a digital representation of value that functions as a medium of exchange, a unit of account and a store of value other than a representation of the United States dollar or a foreign currency. END_STATUTE Sec. 2.2. Conditional enactment This act does not become effective unless the Constitution of Arizona is amended by a vote of the people at the next general election by passage of Senate Concurrent Resolution 1003, fifty-seventh legislature, second regular session, relating to property tax exemptions.